Hawaii statutes.
§414D-116 Corporation's acceptance of
votes. (a) If the name signed on a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or
proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a member, the corporation, acting
in good faith, is entitled to accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or
proxy appointment and to give it effect as the act of the member.

(b) If the name signed on a vote, ballot,
consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the record name of
a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is nevertheless entitled to
accept the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it
effect as the act of the member if:

(1) The member is an entity and the name signed
purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

(2) The name signed purports to be that of an
attorney-in-fact of the member and if the corporation requests, evidence
acceptable to the corporation of the signatory's authority to sign for the
member has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or
proxy appointment;

(3) Two or more persons hold the membership as
co-tenants or fiduciaries, the name signed purports to be the name of at least
one of the co-holders, and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of
all the co-holders;

(4) The name signed purports to be that of an
administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the member and,
if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the
corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, ballot, consent,
waiver, or proxy appointment; and

(5) The name signed purports to be that of a receiver
or trustee in bankruptcy of the member, and, if the corporation requests,
evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with
respect to the vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment.

(c) The corporation is entitled to reject a
vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the secretary or other
officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has
reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or the
signatory's authority to sign for the member.

(d) The corporation and its officer or agent
who accepts or rejects a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in
good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable
in damages to a member for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

(e) Corporate action based on the acceptance
or rejection of a vote, ballot, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under
this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines
otherwise.

(f) A ballot may be signed by means of an
electronic signature in accordance with chapter 489E. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1;
am L 2011, c 37, §10]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next